Utah statutes.
78B-8-601.   Definitions.

For purposes of this part:

(1)  "Forest products" means any tree or portion thereof before it is manufactured into dimensional lumber, timbers, and ties, or mill peeled and made into power poles or house logs, including but not limited to coniferous and deciduous trees, Christmas trees, sawlogs, poles, posts, pulp logs, and fuelwood.

(2)  "Native vegetation" means all other forest, desert, or rangeland vegetation including but not limited to shrubs, flora, roots, bulbs, and seed.

